Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 1 General Provisions; Organization

7-1-630.
Initial subscribers; contents and filing of articles; other required filings; fee for investigation; selection of initial directors.

Any number of persons, not less than eight, having a common bond, as defined in subsection (b) of this Code section, may incorporate for the purpose of organizing a credit union in accordance with this article. The persons so desiring to become incorporated shall execute articles which shall set forth the following:

The name of the proposed credit union;

The territory in which it will operate;

The location where its initial registered office will be located;

The names and addresses of the subscribers, their occupation, length of service, and that each has subscribed to one share and paid for same;

The names and addresses of the original directors;

The proposed field of membership specified in detail and having the same common bond as the subscribers;

That the purpose and nature of the business are to conduct a credit union with the rights and powers granted by this article; and

The term of the existence of the credit union, which shall be perpetual unless otherwise limited.

For purposes of this article, “common bond” is described as that specific relationship of occupation, association, or interest; residence or employment within a well-defined neighborhood, community, or rural district; employees of a common employer; or members of a bona fide cooperative, educational, fraternal, professional, religious, rural, or similar organization which tends to create a mutual interest between persons sharing the relationship. Persons related by blood, adoption, or marriage to or living in the same household with a person within such common bond and the surviving spouses of deceased members shall also be considered within the common bond.

The subscribers shall file the articles with the department together with the fee specified in Code Section 7-1-862. The department shall certify a copy of the articles and return it to the subscribers.

The subscriber shall file with the department a certificate from the Secretary of State attesting that the name of the proposed credit union has been reserved as authorized by Code Section 7-1-131.

The subscriber shall file with the department a copy of the proposed bylaws setting forth the following:

The date of the annual meeting, the manner of conducting the same, the number of members constituting a quorum and regulations as to voting, and the manner of notification of the meeting, which shall comply with Code Section 7-1-6;

The number of directors, which must be not less than five nor more than 25, all of whom must be members, and their powers and duties, together with the duties of the officers elected by the board of directors;

The qualifications for membership of those coming within the initial common bond as required by this article;

The conditions under which deposits are received and withdrawn; and

The charges which shall be made, if any, for failure to meet obligations punctually; whether or not the credit union shall have the power to borrow; and such other matters consistent with this article as may be requisite to the organization and operation of the proposed credit union.

The subscriber shall pay such fee as shall be established by regulation of the department to defray the cost of the investigation required by Code Section 7-1-632, provided that the department shall not be required to set such fee if in its judgment the fee would discourage the organization of credit unions under this article.

The subscriber shall select at least five qualified persons who agree to serve on the board of directors. A signed agreement to serve in these capacities until the first annual meeting or until the election of their successors, whichever is later, shall be executed by those who so agree and filed with the department along with the proposed bylaws.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 1; Code 1933, § 25-101; Code 1933, § 41A-3001, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 19; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 11/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 16/HB 184; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 3-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 16/HB 143; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 18/HB 185.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (e)(4) for the former provisions, which read: “The conditions under which shares may be issued, paid for, transferred, and withdrawn; deposits received and withdrawn; loans made and repaid; and funds otherwise invested; and”; and deleted “the method of receipting for money; the manner of accumulating a reserve; the manner of determining and paying interest and dividends;” following “power to borrow;” in the middle of paragraph (e)(5).

7-1-631.
[Reserved] Additional filings with department.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-3002, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1211, § 11; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 12, effective May 5, 2005.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 12 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective May 5, 2005.

7-1-632.
Approval or disapproval by department; certificate of incorporation.

The department shall make an appropriate investigation of the articles and bylaws for the purpose of determining:

Whether the articles and bylaws conform to this article;

The general character and qualifications of the subscribers and the financial stability and future prospects of the sponsoring company, if any;

The economic advisability of establishing the proposed credit union and such other facts and circumstances bearing on the proposed credit union as in the opinion of the department may be relevant;

That a common bond exists in accordance with Code Section 7-1-630; and

That the subscribers and person or corporation sponsoring the credit union are in agreement as to the services, if any, that the sponsor will provide.

If the department determines to its satisfaction that the proposed credit union meets the criteria set forth above, it shall, within 90 days from receipt of the articles and in compliance with Code Section 7-1-630, send a copy of the articles and written approval of the articles to the Secretary of State after making such changes in the articles or bylaws consistent with this article and with the consent of the subscribers that it deems appropriate. Such approval shall indicate any changes made to the articles including changes from the proposed field of membership. If the department shall disapprove the articles, the procedures of subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-635 shall be followed.

Upon receipt of the approval of the department, the Secretary of State shall thereupon issue a certificate attesting to the incorporation of the credit union. The credit union shall, however, confine itself to organizational activities until it receives a permit to do business.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 3; Code 1933, § 25-103; Code 1933, § 41A-3003, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 17; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 20; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 13/SB 82.

7-1-633.
Organizational meeting of directors; commencing of business.

Within 30 days after receipt of the certificate of incorporation from the Secretary of State, an organizational meeting of the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation shall be held for the purpose of accepting the certificate and bylaws, appointing a credit committee or, in lieu thereof, loan officers and an audit committee, naming the president, and electing or appointing the officers, as provided in Code Section 7-1-655, who shall serve until the first directors’ meeting after the first annual meeting. Notice of the meeting shall be given at least five days prior to the date of the meeting.

When the organization has been completed, the credit union shall notify the department of this fact and may commence business subject to its obtaining deposit insurance as required in Code Section 7-1-666.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, §§ 4, 13; Code 1933, §§ 25-106, 25-113; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-3004, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1244, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 4; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 19/HB 185; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 23/HB 891.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “an audit committee” for “a supervisory committee” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “naming the president,” in the first sentence in subsection (a).

7-1-634.
Amendment of articles and bylaws; fee for investigation; approval or denial by department.

Amendments to the bylaws of a credit union may be adopted and amendments of the articles may be requested by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the authorized number of members of the board of directors at any duly held meeting thereof if the members of the board have been given prior written notice of said meeting and the notice has contained a copy of the proposed amendment or amendments. No amendment of the bylaws or of the articles shall become effective until approved in writing by the department.

Every proposed amendment of the articles shall be filed with the department together with the fee specified in Code Section 7-1-862. Proposed amendments of the bylaws shall be filed with the department.

The credit union may amend its bylaws to change its field of membership by adding additional groups of persons subject to the following conditions:

Each new group must have a common bond that meets one of the descriptions in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-630; and

The credit union must pay such fee as may be established by the department to defray the cost of investigation.

The department shall grant or deny approval of a complete and accepted application to amend the bylaws within 90 days, subject to safety and soundness and other criteria established by the department for these applications.

The department shall maintain a permanent record of any approved amendment to the bylaws of a credit union which changes the field of membership proposed in the original articles or as subsequently amended.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, §§ 6, 11; Code 1933, §§ 25-104, 25-121; Ga. L. 1967, p. 595, § 3; Code 1933, § 41A-3005, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1681, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 18; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 21; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 25; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 14/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 17/HB 184.

7-1-635.
Procedures for department.

The department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove of proposed amendments to the articles or to the bylaws within 90 days after they are submitted by the credit union and within that time shall so advise the Secretary of State of any changes to the articles and inform the credit union in writing of its approval or disapproval.

If the department should disapprove any articles or proposed amendments to articles or bylaws, it shall state the reasons for its disapproval. The subscribers or credit union shall have reasonable time, not more than 90 days from the date of disapproval or such additional time as the department may allow, to correct any matters causing its disapproval. If such matter is corrected, the department shall then advise the Secretary of State and credit union in writing of its approval of changes to the articles or the credit union alone in writing of its approval in the case of amendment of the bylaws.

Final action by the department in approving or disapproving articles or amendments thereto or to the bylaws shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review under Code Section 7-1-90.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 595, § 4; Code 1933, § 41A-3006, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 22; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 15/SB 82.

7-1-635.1.
Out-of-state credit unions.

A credit union organized in another state may conduct business and establish a place of business in this state with the approval of the department. The department must find that the out-of-state credit union:

Is a credit union organized under laws of a state other than the State of Georgia or of the United States, which state grants similar authority to credit unions organized under the laws of this state;

Is financially solvent and operates in conformance with the laws and regulations of its charter jurisdiction; and

Has deposit insurance issued by a federal public body that is comparable to that required for credit unions chartered in this state.

The out-of-state credit union must agree to:

Grant loans at rates not in excess of the rates permitted for credit unions incorporated under the laws of Georgia;

Comply with the same consumer protection provisions that credit unions incorporated under this chapter must obey; and

Designate and maintain an agent for the service of process in this state.

The department may examine the operations of any out-of-state credit union for the purpose of determining that the scope of its activities does not exceed that allowed pursuant to this chapter and that the facility is otherwise operating in compliance with the applicable laws of this state. The department may by regulation establish minimum requirements for the maintenance of books and records in sufficient form to enable the department to carry out its responsibilities under this Code section.

The department may enter into cooperative and reciprocal agreements with the credit union regulatory authority of any government for the periodic examination of credit union offices and facilities of any kind located within this state and may accept reports from such authorities in lieu of conducting its own examination for compliance with the laws of this state.

A credit union which is approved under this Code section shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 15 of Chapter 2 of Title 14.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3008, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 753, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 23; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 16/SB 82; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 18/HB 184.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, “does” was substituted for “do” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2005, “; and” was added at the end of paragraph (a)(2).

7-1-636.
Effect on articles and duration of existing credit unions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair the validity of the articles of a credit union existing on April 1, 1975.

Each credit union existing on April 1, 1975, shall have perpetual duration unless its articles are amended under this chapter to provide for a limited period of duration.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-3007, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.